New Jersey, session 221, A3840.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. For the purposes of this section: "Local enforcing agency" means a municipal agency, fire department, fire district, or county fire marshal authorized by municipal ordinance to enforce the "Uniform Fire Safety Act," P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.) within a specific local jurisdiction. Medical provider means a licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice nurse. Minor means a juvenile under 18 years of age. b. Every instance of a burn injury, in the case of a minor, or a second or third degree burn injury, in the case of an adult, shall be reported within 48 hours to the local enforcing agency of the municipality in which the patient lives, along with the date when the burn injury was received, or both when a burn is presented for treatment in a hospital or health care facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) or an office where medical care is provided. The burn injury shall be reported by the medical provider who was consulted, attended, or treated the patient for the burn injury, or the administrator or administrators designee of the hospital, health care facility, or office where the burn injury was presented for treatment. The burn injury report shall include the date when the burn injury was received. 2.    The Commissioner of Health, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs, shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, except that the commissioner may take administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.